Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2703
Definitions, where found; citation to Code of Federal Regulations.

For purposes of the Scrapie Control and Eradication Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 54-2704 to 54-2741 shall be used. All citations to the Code of Federal Regulations, C.F.R., in the act refer to such regulations as they existed on January 1, 2003.

Laws 2003, LB 158, § 3.